District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.63

Compensation for subordinate agency attorneys and support staff during transition.

Until the Legal Service budget for attorneys and support staff who perform work, primarily as or for the General Counsel of a subordinate agency is transferred to the budget of the subordinate agency involved, the Office of the Attorney General shall continue to be responsible for the compensation of these attorneys and support staff and for related non-personal services expenses. After the budget is transferred, the subordinate agency shall reimburse the Office of the Attorney General for any costs or expenses incurred between October 1, 2014, and the completion of the transfer from the Office of the Attorney General to the subordinate agency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 863
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3012(j), 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(j), 60 DCR 15487
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 1012(b), 1014(a)(2), 61 DCR 9990
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote the section which read “Until the Legal Service budgets of the subordinate agencies are transferred to the budget of the Attorney General, the subordinate agencies that employed the attorneys who are transferred to the employment of the Office of the Attorney General pursuant to this chapter shall continue to be responsible for their compensation.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155, § 1012, substituted “October 1, 2018” for “October 1, 2014” in the last sentence.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014, substituted “October 1, 2014” for “October 1, 2018” in the last sentence.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3012(j) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).